California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs of review shall, so far as applicable and not in conflict with this part, apply to proceedings instituted in the Supreme Court or court of appeal under this article.

(c) Under this article, the Supreme Court may review decisions of the court of appeal in the manner provided for other civil actions.

(d) The Supreme Court shall grant expedited consideration to any party or commission petition alleging that the court of appeal has assumed jurisdiction to review a commission decision pertaining solely to water corporations over which the court of appeal has no jurisdiction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 953, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.

(a) No court of this state, except the Supreme Court and the court of appeal, to the extent specified in this article, shall have jurisdiction to review, reverse, correct, or annul any order or decision of the commission or to suspend or delay the execution or operation thereof, or to enjoin, restrain, or interfere with the commission in the performance of its official duties, as provided by law and the rules of court.

(b) The writ of mandamus shall lie from the Supreme Court and from the court of appeal to the commission in all proper cases as prescribed in Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 886, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.

Notwithstanding Sections 1757 and 1757.1, in any proceeding wherein the validity of any order or decision is challenged on the ground that it violates any right of petitioner under the United States Constitution or the California Constitution, the Supreme Court or court of appeal shall exercise independent judgment on the law and the facts, and the findings or conclusions of the commission material to the determination of the constitutional question shall not be final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 886, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1761.

(a) Any stay or suspension of an order or decision of the commission shall be granted only in accordance with this article and the rules of court.

(b) A stay may be issued against any order or decision of the commission, other than an order or decision increasing or decreasing rates or changing a rate classification.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 855, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1762.

(a) Except as provided in this section, no order staying or suspending an order or decision of the commission shall be made by the Supreme Court or court of appeal except upon five days’ notice and after hearing. If the order or decision of the commission is stayed or suspended, the order suspending it shall contain a specific finding, based upon evidence submitted to the court and identified by reference thereto.

(b) The specific finding made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall certify that great or irreparable damage would otherwise result to the petitioner and specify the nature of the damage.

(c) The Supreme Court or court of appeal may grant a temporary stay restraining the operation of the commission order or decision, other than an order or decision authorizing an increase or decrease in rates or changing a rate classification, at any time before the required hearing and determination of the application for a stay when, in the opinion of the court, irreparable loss or damage would result to petitioner unless the temporary stay is granted. The temporary stay shall remain in force only until the hearing determination of the application for a stay upon notice. The hearing of the application for a stay shall be given precedence and assigned for hearing at the earliest practicable day after the expiration of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 855, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1763.

(a) No temporary stay shall be granted by the Supreme Court or court of appeal unless it clearly appears from specific facts shown by the verified petition that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the applicant before notice can be served and hearing had on a motion for a stay as provided in this article.

(b) Every temporary stay shall be endorsed with the date and hour of issuance, shall be forthwith filed in the clerk’s office and entered of record, shall define the injury and state why it appears to be irreparable and why the order was granted without notice, and shall by its terms expire within a time after entry not to exceed 10 days as the court may fix, unless within the time so fixed the order is extended for a like period for good cause shown and the reasons for the extension entered of record.

(c) In case a temporary stay is granted without notice, the matter of the issuance of a stay shall be set down for hearing at the earliest possible time, and when it comes up for hearing the party obtaining the temporary stay shall proceed with the application for a stay. If the party does not so proceed, the court shall dissolve the temporary stay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 855, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.

In case the order or decision of the commission is stayed or a temporary stay granted, the order of the Supreme Court or court of appeal shall not become effective until a suspending bond is executed and filed with and approved by the court, payable to the people of the State of California and sufficient in amount and security to insure the prompt payment by the party petitioning for the review, of all damages caused by the delay in the enforcement of the order or decision of the commission and of all money which any person or corporation may be compelled to pay pending the review of the proceedings for transportation, transmission, product, commodity, or service in excess of the charges fixed by the order or decision of the commission, in case the order or decision is sustained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 855, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1766.

(a) Under no circumstance shall the Supreme Court or court of appeal stay or suspend any order or decision by the commission authorizing an increase or decrease in rates or changing any rate classification.

(b) If a commission order or decision authorizing any increase or decrease in rates, or changing any rate classification, is set aside by the Supreme Court or court of appeal, the matter shall be referred back to the commission for further action consistent with the order of the court. The commission, in taking this further action, shall not authorize refunds, and any relief ordered by the commission that shall have the effect of increasing or decreasing rates shall be prospective only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 855, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.

All actions and proceedings under this part and all actions or proceedings to which the commission or the people of the State of California are parties in which any question arises under this part, or under or concerning any order or decision of the commission, shall be preferred over, and shall be heard and determined in preference to, all other civil business except election causes, irrespective of position on the calendar. The same preference shall be granted upon application of the attorney of the commission in any action or proceeding in which he is allowed to intervene.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.

The following procedures shall apply to judicial review of an order or decision of the commission interpreting, implementing, or applying the provisions of Chapter 4 of the Statutes of the 2001–02 First Extraordinary Session that (1) relates to the determination or implementation of the revenue requirements of the Department of Water Resources or the establishment or implementation of bond or power charges necessary to recover those revenue requirements, or (2) in the sole determination of the department, the expedited review of an order or decision of the commission is necessary or desirable, for the maintenance of any credit ratings on any bonds or notes of the department issued pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code or for the department to meet its obligations with respect to any bonds or notes pursuant to that division:

(a) Within 30 days after the commission issues its order or decision denying the application for a rehearing, or, if the application is granted, then within 30 days after the commission issues its decision on rehearing, any aggrieved party may petition for a writ of review in the California Supreme Court for the purpose of determining the lawfulness of the original order or decision or of the order or decision on rehearing. If the writ issues, it shall be made returnable at a time and place specified by court order and shall direct the commission to certify its record in the case to the court within the time specified. No order of the commission interpreting, implementing, or applying the provisions of Chapter 4 of the Statutes of the 2001–02 First Extraordinary Session shall be subject to review in the courts of appeal.

(b) The petition for review shall be served upon the executive director and the general counsel of the commission either personally or by service at the office of the commission.

(c) For purposes of this section, the issuance of a decision or the granting of an application shall be construed to have occurred on the date of issuance, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1731.

(d) All actions and proceedings under this section and all actions or proceedings to which the commission or the people of the State of California are parties in which any question arises under this section, or under or concerning any order or decision of the commission under this section, shall be preferred over, and shall be heard and determined in preference to, all other civil business except election causes, irrespective of position on the calendar.

(e) The provisions of this article apply to actions under this section to the extent that those provisions are not in conflict with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 217, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1770.

The following procedures shall apply to the judicial review of an order or decision of the commission in interpreting, implementing, or applying the provisions of Article 5.7 (commencing with Section 849) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1:

(a) Within 30 days after the commission issues its order or decision denying the application for a rehearing or, if the application is granted, within 30 days after the commission issues its decision on rehearing, an aggrieved party may petition for a writ of review in the California Supreme Court for the purpose of determining the lawfulness of the original order or decision or of the order or decision on the rehearing. If the writ is issued, it
 shall be made returnable at a time and place specified by court order and shall direct the commission to certify its record in the case to the court within the time specified. No order of the commission interpreting, implementing, or applying the provisions of Article 5.7 (commencing with Section 849) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 shall be subject to review in a court of appeals.

(b) The petition for review shall be served upon the executive director of the commission either personally or by service at the office of the commission.

(c) For purposes of this section, the issuance of a decision or the granting of an application shall be construed to have occurred on the date when the commission mails the decision or grant to the parties of the action or proceeding.

(d) To the extent that the provisions do not conflict, provisions in this article shall apply to actions under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 482, Sec. 8.   (SB 936)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Witnesses [1791. - 1795.]

1791.

Each witness who appears by order of the commission or a commissioner shall receive for his attendance the same fees and mileage allowed by law to a witness in civil cases, which shall be paid by the party at whose request the witness is subpenaed. When any witness who has not been required to attend at the request of any party is subpenaed by the commission, his fees and mileage shall be paid from the funds appropriated for the use of the commission in the same manner as other expenses of the commission are paid. Any witness subpenaed except one whose fees and mileage may be paid from the funds of the commission, may, at the time of service, demand the fee to which he is entitled for travel to and from the place at which he is required to appear, and one day’s attendance. If such witness demands such fees at the time of service, and they are not at that time paid or tendered, he shall not be required to appear. All fees or mileage to which any witness is entitled under the provisions of this section may be collected by action therefor instituted by the person to whom such fees are payable. No witness furnished with free transportation shall receive mileage for the distance he may have traveled on such free transportation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1792.

In case of the refusal of any witness to attend or testify or produce any papers required by a subpena issued by the commission or any commissioner, the commission or the commissioner may file, in the superior court in and for the county, or city and county, in which the proceedings is pending, a petition, setting forth that due notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of the witness, or the production of the papers, and that the witness has been summoned in the manner prescribed in this part and has failed and refused to attend or produce the papers required by the subpena, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him in the course of the proceeding. The petition shall include a request for an order of the court, compelling the witness to attend and testify or produce the papers before the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.

Upon the filing of the petition the court shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place fixed in the order and show cause why he has not attended and testified or produced said papers before the commission. The time fixed shall not be more than 10 days from the date of the order. A copy of the order shall be served upon the witness. If it appears to the court that the subpena was regularly issued by the commission or a commissioner, the court shall thereupon enter an order that the witness appear before the commission or commissioner at the time and place fixed in the order, and testify or produce the required papers, and upon failure to obey the order, the witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court. The remedy provided in this section is cumulative, and shall not be construed to impair or interfere with the power of the commission or a commissioner to enforce the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, and to punish for contempt in the same manner and to the same extent as courts of record.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1794.

The commission or any commissioner or any party may, in any investigation or hearing before the commission, cause the deposition of witnesses residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in civil actions in the superior courts of this state under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure and to that end may compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, waybills, documents, papers, and accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.

No person shall be excused from testifying or from producing any book, waybill, document, paper, or account in any investigation or inquiry by or hearing before the commission or any commissioner, when ordered to do so, upon the ground that the testimony or evidence, book, waybill, document, paper, or account required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to penalty or forfeiture, but no person shall be prosecuted, punished, or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any act, transaction, matter or thing concerning which, under oath, he has testified or produced documentary evidence, but no person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution or punishment for any perjury committed by him in his testimony. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as in any manner giving to any public utility immunity of any kind.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Intervenor’s Fees and Expenses [1801. - 1812.]

1801.

The purpose of this article is to provide compensation for reasonable advocate’s fees, reasonable expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs to public utility customers of participation or intervention in any proceeding of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 942, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.3.

It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a) The provisions of this article shall apply to all formal proceedings of the commission involving electrical, gas, water, and telephone utilities.

(b) The provisions of this article shall be administered in a manner that encourages the effective and efficient participation of all groups that have a stake in the public utility regulation process.

(c) The process for finding
 eligibility for intervenor compensation be streamlined, by simplifying the preliminary showing by an intervenor of issues, budget, and costs.

(d) Intervenors be compensated for making a substantial contribution to proceedings of the commission, as determined by the commission in its orders and decisions, regardless of whether a settlement agreement is reached.

(e) Intervenor compensation be awarded to eligible intervenors in a timely manner, within a reasonable period after the intervenor has made the substantial contribution to a proceeding that is the basis for the compensation award.

(f) This article shall be
 administered in a manner that avoids unproductive or unnecessary participation that duplicates the participation of similar interests otherwise adequately represented or participation that is not necessary for a fair determination of the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 808, Sec. 8.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.

As used in this article:

(a) “Compensation” means payment for all or part, as determined by the commission, of reasonable advocate’s fees, reasonable expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs of preparation for and participation in a proceeding, and includes the fees and costs of obtaining an award under this article and of obtaining judicial review, if any.

(b) (1) “Customer” means any of the following:

(A) A participant representing consumers, customers, or subscribers of any electrical, gas, telephone, telegraph, or
 water
 corporation that is subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.

(B) A representative who has been authorized by a customer.

(C) A representative of a group or organization authorized pursuant to its articles of incorporation or bylaws to represent the interests of residential customers, or to represent small commercial customers who receive bundled electric service from an electrical corporation.

(2) “Customer” does not include any state, federal, or local government agency, any publicly owned public utility, or any entity that, in the commission’s opinion, was established or formed by a local government entity for the purpose of participating in a commission proceeding.

(c) “Expert witness fees” means recorded or billed costs incurred by a customer for an expert witness.

(d) “Eligible local government entity” means a city, county, or city and county that is not a publicly owned public utility that intervenes or participates in a commission proceeding for the purpose of protecting the health and safety of the residents within the entity’s jurisdiction following a catastrophic material
 loss suffered by its residents either in significant damage to infrastructure or loss of life and property, or both, as a direct result of public utility infrastructure.

(e) “Other reasonable costs” means reasonable out-of-pocket expenses directly incurred by a customer that are directly related to the contentions or recommendations made by the customer that resulted in a substantial contribution.

(f) “Party” means any interested party, respondent public utility, or commission staff in a hearing or proceeding.

(g) “Proceeding” means an application, complaint, or investigation, rulemaking, alternative dispute resolution procedures in lieu of formal proceedings as may be sponsored or
 endorsed by the commission, or other formal proceeding before the commission.

(h) “Significant financial hardship” means either that the customer cannot afford, without undue hardship, to pay the costs of effective participation, including advocate’s fees, expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs of participation, or that, in the case of a group or organization, the economic interest of the individual members of the group or organization is small in comparison to the costs of effective participation in the proceeding.

(i) “Small commercial customer” means any nonresidential customer with a maximum peak demand of less than 50 kilowatts. The commission may establish rules to modify or change the definition of “small commercial customer,” including use of criteria other
 than a peak demand threshold, if the commission determines that the modification or change will promote participation in proceedings at the commission by organizations representing small businesses, without incorporating large commercial and industrial customers.

(j) “Substantial contribution” means that, in the judgment of the commission, the customer’s presentation has substantially assisted the commission in the making of its order or decision because the order or decision has adopted in whole or in part one or more factual contentions, legal contentions, or specific policy or procedural recommendations presented by the customer. Where the customer’s participation has resulted in a substantial contribution, even if the decision adopts that customer’s contention or recommendations only in part, the commission may award the customer
 compensation for all reasonable advocate’s fees, reasonable expert fees, and other reasonable costs incurred by the customer in preparing or presenting that contention or recommendation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 808, Sec. 9.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.3.

A representative of a group representing the interests of small commercial customers who receive bundled electric service from an electrical corporation shall not be eligible for an award of compensation pursuant to this article if the representative has a conflict arising from prior representation before the commission. This conflict may not be waived.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.4.

An eligible local government entity is eligible for an award of compensation pursuant to this article for its involvement to the extent that the involvement was for the purpose of protecting health and safety within the entity’s jurisdiction and to the extent that the involvement was germane to the material loss suffered by its residents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 808, Sec. 10.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.5.

Participation by a customer that materially supplements, complements, or contributes to the presentation of another party, including the commission staff, may be fully eligible for compensation if the participation makes a substantial contribution to a commission order or decision, consistent with Section 1801.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 942, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.

The commission shall award reasonable advocate’s fees, reasonable expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs of preparation for and participation in a hearing or proceeding to any customer who complies with Section 1804 and satisfies both of the following requirements:

(a) The customer’s presentation makes a substantial contribution to the adoption, in whole or in part, of the commission’s order or decision.

(b) Participation or intervention without an award of fees or costs imposes a significant financial hardship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 942, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.1.

The commission shall adopt a policy to allow reasonable advocate’s fees, reasonable expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs of preparation for and participation in a hearing or proceeding to an eligible local government entity that complies with Section 1804 and satisfies all of the following requirements:

(a) The entity’s presentation makes a substantial contribution to the adoption, in whole or in part, of the commission’s order or decision.

(b) Participation or intervention without an award of fees or costs imposes a significant financial hardship.

(c) The subject of the hearing or proceeding is the result of a triggering event, as determined by the commission, that significantly impacted the residents of the local government entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 808, Sec. 11.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.

(a) (1) A customer who, or eligible local government entity that, intends to seek an award under this article shall, within 30 days after the prehearing conference is held, file and serve on all parties to the proceeding a notice of intent to claim compensation. In cases where no prehearing conference is scheduled or where the commission anticipates that the proceeding will take less than 30 days, the commission may determine the procedure to be used in filing these requests. In cases where the schedule would not reasonably allow parties to identify issues within the timeframe set forth above, or where new issues emerge subsequent to the time set for filing, the commission may determine an
 appropriate procedure for accepting new or revised notices of intent.

(2) (A) The notice of intent to claim compensation shall include both of the following:

(i) A statement of the nature and extent of the customer’s or eligible local government entity’s planned participation in the proceeding as far as it is possible to set it out when the notice of intent is filed.

(ii) An itemized estimate of the compensation that the customer or eligible local government entity expects to request, given the likely duration of the proceeding as it appears at the time.

(B) The notice of intent may also include a showing by the customer or eligible
 local government entity that participation in the hearing or proceeding would pose a significant financial hardship. Alternatively, such a showing shall be included in the request submitted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(C) Within 15 days after service of the notice of intent to claim compensation, the administrative law judge may direct the staff, and may permit any other interested party, to file a statement responding to the notice.

(b) (1) If the customer’s or eligible local government entity’s showing of significant financial hardship was included in the notice filed pursuant to subdivision (a), the administrative law judge, in consultation with the assigned commissioner, shall issue within 30 days thereafter a preliminary ruling addressing whether the customer
 or eligible local government entity will be eligible for an award of compensation. The ruling shall address whether a showing of significant financial hardship has been made. A finding of significant financial hardship shall create a rebuttable presumption of eligibility for compensation in other commission proceedings commencing within one year of the date of that finding.

(2) The administrative law judge may, in any event, issue a ruling addressing issues raised by the notice of intent to claim compensation. The ruling may point out similar positions, areas of potential duplication in showings, unrealistic expectation for compensation, and any other matter that may affect the customer’s or eligible local government entity’s ultimate claim for compensation. Failure of the ruling to point out similar positions or potential duplication or
 any other potential impact on the ultimate claim for compensation shall not imply approval of any claim for compensation. A finding of significant financial hardship in no way ensures compensation. Similarly, the failure of the customer or eligible local government entity to identify a specific issue in the notice of intent or to precisely estimate potential compensation shall not preclude an award of reasonable compensation if a substantial contribution is made.

(c) Following issuance of a final order or decision by the commission in the hearing or proceeding, a customer who, or eligible local government entity that, has been found, pursuant to subdivision (b), to be eligible for an award of compensation may file within 60 days a request for an award. The request shall include at a minimum a detailed description of services and expenditures
 and a description of the customer’s or eligible local government entity’s substantial contribution to the hearing or proceeding. Within 30 days after service of the request, the commission staff may file, and any other party may file, a response to the request.

(d) The commission may audit the records and books of the customer or eligible local government entity to the extent necessary to verify the basis for the award. The commission shall preserve the confidentiality of the customer’s or eligible local government entity’s records in making its audit. Within 20 days after completion of the audit, if any, the commission shall direct that an audit report shall be prepared and filed. Any other party may file a response to the audit report within 20 days thereafter.

(e) Within 75 days after the filing of a request for compensation pursuant to subdivision (c), or within 50 days after the filing of an audit report, whichever occurs later, the commission shall issue a decision that determines whether or not the customer or eligible local government entity has made a substantial contribution to the final order or decision in the hearing or proceeding. If the commission finds that the customer or eligible local government entity requesting compensation has made a substantial contribution, the commission shall describe this substantial contribution and shall determine the amount of compensation to be paid pursuant to Section 1806.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 808, Sec. 12.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1806.

The computation of compensation awarded pursuant to Section 1804 shall take into consideration the market rates paid to persons of comparable training and experience who offer similar services. The compensation awarded may not, in any case, exceed the comparable market rate for services paid by the commission or the public utility, whichever is greater, to persons of comparable training and experience who are offering similar services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 942, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.

(a) An award made under this article shall be paid by the public utility that is the subject of the hearing, investigation, or proceeding, as determined by the commission, within 30 days. Notwithstanding any other law, an award paid by a public utility pursuant to this article shall be allowed by the commission as an expense for the purpose of establishing rates of the public utility by way of a dollar-for-dollar adjustment to rates imposed by the commission immediately on the determination of the amount of the award, so that the amount of the award shall be fully recovered within one year from the date of the award.

(b) Due to the bankruptcy of Sacramento Natural Gas Storage, the
 commission’s intervenor compensation award to the Avondale Glen Elder Neighborhood Association in A.07-04-013 has been reduced to a fraction of the amount awarded. In this limited circumstance, the commission may pay to the Avondale Glen Elder Neighborhood Association the difference between the amount received from the bankruptcy court and the amount awarded by the commission by increasing the fees collected in Section 401 for the limited purpose of D.13-11-018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 156.5.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.

The commission shall deny any award to any customer or eligible local government entity that attempts to delay or obstruct the orderly and timely fulfillment of the commission’s responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 808, Sec. 13.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.

A group or association that represents the interests of small agricultural customers in a proceeding and that would otherwise be eligible for an award of compensation pursuant to Section 1804 without the presence of large agricultural customers, as determined by the commission, shall not be deemed ineligible solely because that group or organization also has members who are large agricultural customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 942, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Computer Models [1821. - 1822.]

1821.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Computer model” means a computer program.

(b) “Operations model” means a computer model that replicates, lists, describes, or forecasts a public utility’s internal functions, including, but not limited to, its accounting procedures, cash management procedures, personnel assignments and procedures, and inventory control.

(c) “Planning model” means a computer model that replicates, lists, describes, or forecasts a public utility’s complex functions, including, but not limited to, the forecasting of future loads and resources, calculating costs of electricity generation, producing financial statements, and calculating costs of natural gas production or supply.

(d) “Public utility” includes every public utility and every business which is a commission regulated subsidiary or commission regulated affiliate of a public utility. “Public utility” does not include a common carrier or a telephone corporation whose service is determined to be competitive by the commission.

(e) “Verify” means to assess the extent to which the computer model mimics reality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1297, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1822.

(a) Any computer model that is the basis for any testimony or exhibit in a hearing or proceeding before the commission shall be available to, and subject to verification by, the commission and parties to the hearing or proceedings to the extent necessary for cross-examination or rebuttal, subject to applicable rules of evidence, except that verification is not required for any electricity demand model or forecast prepared by the Energy Commission pursuant to Section 25309 or 25402.1 of the Public Resources Code and approved and adopted after a hearing during which testimony was offered subject to cross-examination. The commission shall afford each of these electricity demand models or forecasts the evidentiary weight it determines appropriate. Nothing in this subdivision requires the Energy
 Commission to approve or adopt any electricity demand model or forecast.

(b) Any testimony presented in a hearing or proceeding before the commission that is based in whole, or in part, on a computer model shall include a listing of all the equations and assumptions built into the model.

(c) Any database that is used for any testimony or exhibit in a hearing or proceeding before the commission shall be reasonably accessible to the commission staff and parties to the hearing or proceeding to the extent necessary for cross-examination or rebuttal, subject to applicable rules of evidence, as applied in commission proceedings.

(d) The commission shall adopt rules and procedures to meet the requirements specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c). These rules shall include procedural safeguards that protect databases and
 models not owned by the public utility.

(e) The commission shall establish appropriate procedures for determining the appropriate level of compensation for a party’s access.

(f) Each party shall have access to the computer programs and models of each other party to the extent provided by Section 1822. The commission shall not require a utility to provide a remote terminal or other direct physical link to the computer systems of a utility to a third party.

(g) The commission shall verify, validate, and review the computer models of any electrical corporation that are used for the purpose of planning, operating, constructing, or maintaining the corporation’s electrical transmission system, and that are the basis for testimony and exhibits in hearings and proceedings before the commission.

(h) The transmission computer models shall be available to, and subject to verification by, each party to a commission proceeding in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1822, and regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1822.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 34.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Receiverships [1825. - 1826.]

1825.

(a) If the commission determines in a proceeding that the appointment of a receiver is warranted pursuant to the processes or procedures adopted by the commission in its Decision 20-05-053, the commission may petition the superior court for the county within which PG&E Corporation has its principal office or place of business for the appointment of a receiver, as provided in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 564 of the Code of Civil Procedure, to assume possession of Pacific Gas and Electric Company’s property and to operate its system.

(b) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:
